src/closed-nob-lex.txt
LEXICON 2ROMAN                                !^C^
 2ROM-THOUSAND ;                         !^C^
 2ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !^C^
 2ROM-TEN ;                                  !^C^
 2ROM-ONE ;                                  !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND                       !^C^
 M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                     !^C^
 MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                     !^C^
 MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                 !^C^
 MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                 !^C^
 MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;                 !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG                    !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                             !^C^
 2ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED                        !^C^
 C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^
 DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                 !^C^
 CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;                     !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG                    !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                             !^C^
 2ROM-TEN ;                                 !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN                               !^C^
 X 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                           !^C^
 XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                          !^C^
 XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                          !^C^
 L 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                           !^C^
 LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                          !^C^
 LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                         !^C^
 LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                        !^C^
 XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;                          !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG                           !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                               !^C^
 2ROM-ONE ;                                 !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE                               !^C^
 I 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                           !^C^
 II 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                          !^C^
 III 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 IV  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 V 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                           !^C^
 VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                          !^C^
 VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                         !^C^
 VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                        !^C^
 IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;                          !^C^

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG                           !^C^
  ROMNUMTAG ;                               !^C^

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG                              !^C^
 +Det+Qnt+Pl: # ;                              !^C^
 NON-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON NON-ONE-TAG
 +A+Ord:%. # ;                              !^C^ !III. as ordinal.
! +A+Ord: # ;                                !^C^ ! No trouble.
 +Det+Qnt+Pl:%: # ;                     !^C^
 +Det+Qnt+Pl:%' # ;                     !^C^
 +Det+Qnt+Pl:%- # ;                     !^C^
 +Det+Qnt+Pl:%´ # ;                     !^C^
 +Det+Qnt+Pl:   # ;                     !^C^





! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !


LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP                        !^C^
½+Det+Qnt+Sg:½ # ;                                 !^C^
¹+Det+Qnt+Sg:¹ # ;                                 !^C^
²+Det+Qnt+Pl:² # ;                                 !^C^
³+Det+Qnt+Pl:³ # ;                                 !^C^
¼+Det+Qnt+Sg:¼ # ;                                 !^C^
